apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_adj.ca.dix
    <pardef n="abusi/u__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ves</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="priva/t__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="pr/opi__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òpies</l>
          <r>opi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òpia</l>
          <r>opi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>opis</l>
          <r>opi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>opi</l>
          <r>opi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amfitri/ó__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ones</l>
          <r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ona</l>
          <r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="agrícol/a__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="afectu/ós__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oses</l>
          <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osa</l>
          <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osos</l>
          <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ós</l>
          <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
   <!--   <e>
        <p>
          <l>osíssimes</l>
          <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osíssima</l>
          <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osíssims</l>
          <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osíssim</l>
          <r>ós<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> -->
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="genu/í__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïnes</l>
          <r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïna</l>
          <r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïns</l>
          <r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
     <pardef n="de_vida__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="ben__preadv">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 </pardefs>

<e lm="més" r="RL"><i>més</i><par n="ben__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="de l'est"><i>de<b/>l'est</i><par n="de_vida__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de l'oest"><i>de<b/>l'oest</i><par n="de_vida__adj"/></e>
<e lm="del nord"><i>del<b/>nord</i><par n="de_vida__adj"/></e>
<e lm="del sud"><i>del<b/>sud</i><par n="de_vida__adj"/></e>
<e lm="veí"><i>ve</i><par n="genu/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="costós"><i>cost</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fabulós"><i>fabul</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="espantós"><i>espant</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="capitalista"><i>capitalist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="actiu"><i>acti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="impulsiu"><i>impulsi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tradicionalista"><i>tradicionalist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="omanita"><i>omanit</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="deliciós"><i>delici</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ambiciós"><i>ambici</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="extremista"><i>extremist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="objectiu"><i>objecti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pessimista"><i>pessimist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="infructuós"><i>infructu</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="viscós"><i>visc</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fatalista"><i>fatalist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="minuciós"><i>minuci</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="altruista"><i>altruist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blau"><i>bla</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sorollós"><i>soroll</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="successiu"><i>successi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="determinista"><i>determinist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="passiu"><i>passi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="retrospectiu"><i>retrospecti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="incisiu"><i>incisi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="feixista"><i>feixist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="religiós"><i>religi</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="relatiu"><i>relati</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="maliciós"><i>malici</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="destructiu"><i>destructi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fastigós"><i>fastig</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prestigiós"><i>prestigi</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="defensiu"><i>defensi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="porós"><i>por</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="misteriós"><i>misteri</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="neofeixista"><i>neofeixist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amistós"><i>amist</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="estructuralista"><i>estructuralist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="eslau"><i>esla</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="materialista"><i>materialist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="respectiu"><i>respecti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="representatiu"><i>representati</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="proteccionista"><i>proteccionist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="explosiu"><i>explosi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sospitós"><i>sospit</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rodó"><i>rod</i><par n="amfitri/ó__adj"/></e>
<e lm="orgullós"><i>orgull</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="impropi"><i>impr</i><par n="pr/opi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tediós"><i>tedi</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="conceptualista"><i>conceptualist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anglosaxó"><i>anglosax</i><par n="amfitri/ó__adj"/></e>
<e lm="centralista"><i>centralist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="explicatiu"><i>explicati</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="especulatiu"><i>especulati</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inflacionista"><i>inflacionist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="naturalista"><i>naturalist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="còncau"><i>cònca</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="letó"><i>let</i><par n="amfitri/ó__adj"/></e>
<e lm="optimista"><i>optimist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="positiu"><i>positi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="intensiu"><i>intensi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vergonyós"><i>vergony</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="festiu"><i>festi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="jacobita"><i>jacobit</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="realista"><i>realist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="digestiu"><i>digesti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="racista"><i>racist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="elitista"><i>elitist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dubtós"><i>dubt</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rigorós"><i>rigor</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="consultiu"><i>consulti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nòmada"><i>nòmad</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="expansionista"><i>expansionist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vietnamita"><i>vietnamit</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="intuïtiu"><i>intuïti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fetitxista"><i>fetitxist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="seriós"><i>seri</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="monetarista"><i>monetarist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="negatiu"><i>negati</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="propi"><i>pr</i><par n="pr/opi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="constructivista"><i>constructivist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="genuí"><i>genu</i><par n="genu/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="curiós"><i>curi</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="afectuós"><i>afectu</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="col·lectiu"><i>col·lecti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="respectuós"><i>respectu</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="calcícola"><i>calcícol</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="desastrós"><i>desastr</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="afirmatiu"><i>afirmati</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="furiós"><i>furi</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="laboriós"><i>labori</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="egoista"><i>egoist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nociu"><i>noci</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="carnós"><i>carn</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exclusiu"><i>exclusi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prohibicionista"><i>prohibicionist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="coercitiu"><i>coerciti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="defectuós"><i>defectu</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fangós"><i>fang</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="natiu"><i>nati</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="progressiu"><i>progressi</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alcista"><i>alcist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="educatiu"><i>educati</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nacionalista"><i>nacionalist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nutritiu"><i>nutriti</i><par n="abusi/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="perillós"><i>perill</i><par n="afectu/ós__adj"/></e>
<e lm="simbolista"><i>simbolist</i><par n="agrícol/a__adj"/></e>
